Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.112] MINNESOTA CIVIC SEAL DESIGNATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota Civic Seal designation is established for high school students who have demonstrated excellence in civics education and engagement. The purpose of this designation is to encourage civic learning, promote active participation in democratic institutions, and recognize students who have achieved a high level of civic knowledge, skills, and community involvement. new text end new text begin (b) A student must meet the following minimum criteria to be awarded the Minnesota Civic Seal: new text end new text begin (1) successfully complete coursework in civics, government, or a related subject that meets or exceeds the state's academic standards for civic education; new text end new text begin (2) participate in a civics-related project-based assessment that demonstrates an understanding of civic engagement, public policy, or government operations, and complete a self-reflection evaluating the learning experience, impact, and personal growth gained from the project; new text end new text begin (3) engage in at least one civic activity outside the classroom, such as voting in a student election, attending a public meeting, participating in a community service project, participating in Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps, or engaging in a policy advocacy initiative; new text end new text begin (4) demonstrate civic dispositions such as civil discourse, respect for diverse perspectives, and a commitment to democratic principles; and new text end new text begin (5) meet any additional criteria established by the department, ensuring that all students, regardless of background, have equitable access to earning the civic seal. new text end new text begin (c) The department-developed criteria under paragraph (b), clause (5), must be broad enough to allow any student in any region or community of the state to earn the seal without having to spend personal resources to access the criteria or activity. No specific out-of-school or partisan civic program or provider shall be named or required as criteria. A school district or individual school must not be obligated to participate in the civic seal program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Criteria development. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must convene a working group to establish specific criteria and guidelines for awarding the Minnesota Civic Seal. The working group membership must include civic educators, professional development providers, at least one high school student, and other civic engagement experts. new text end new text begin (b) The criteria and guidelines must be broad enough to allow a student from any region or background to earn the civic seal without requiring any personal financial expenditure or participation in a specific out-of-school program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin School district or charter school participation. new text end new text begin (a) Participation in the Minnesota Civic Seal program is voluntary for school districts and charter schools. A school district or charter school that opts into the program must: new text end new text begin (1) provide information to all secondary students regarding the opportunity to earn the civic seal and the criteria for being awarded the recognition; new text end new text begin (2) maintain appropriate records to identify students who have earned the civic seal; and new text end new text begin (3) affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma of each student who earns the civic seal and record the designation on their official transcript. new text end new text begin (b) A district or charter school must not charge a fee to a student or the student's family for participation in earning the civic seal. new text end new text begin (c) A school district or charter school must submit an application for approval to the commissioner to participate. The application must include a narrative that describes the district or charter school's program implementation plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Insignia and recognition. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Education must develop and distribute an official insignia to be affixed to the diplomas of students who earn the Minnesota Civic Seal. new text end new text begin (b) The department may also provide additional materials to schools to recognize and celebrate students who achieve the civic seal designation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 academic school year and applies to students graduating in 2027 and later. new text end